Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-272.02
Court appointed special advocate volunteer.

The court may appoint a court appointed special advocate volunteer pursuant to the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 22.

Court Appointed Special Advocate Act, see section 43-3701.